Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1303
Citizen participation.

Whenever a city proposes to exercise the power conferred in sections 15-1301 to 15-1307, the city shall certify that it has afforded adequate opportunity for citizen participation in the development of the annual application and has provided for the meaningful involvement of the residents of areas in which community development activities are to be concentrated in the planning and execution of these activities, including the provision of adequate information and resources.

Laws 1974, LB 825, § 3.